Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.340

Identification of core services for budget purposes—Generally.

It is the intent of the legislature that a basic core of uniform services be provided by educational service districts and be identified in statute so that biennial budget requests for educational service districts may be based upon measurable goals and needs. Educational service districts as noted in RCW 28A.310.010, are intended primarily to:

(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local districts and to perform functions for those districts when such functions are more effectively or economically administered from the regional level;

(2) Assist the state educational agencies, office of superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education in the legal performance of their duties; and

(3) Assist in providing pupils with equal educational opportunities.

The purpose of RCW 28A.310.350 and 28A.310.360 is to further identify those core services in order to prepare educational service district budgets for the 1979-81 biennium, and those bienniums beyond.

[ 1990 c 33 s 286; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.21.136.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.